Washington statutes.
RCW 11.118.005

Purpose—Intent.

The purpose of this chapter is to recognize and validate certain trusts that are established for the benefit of animals. Under the common law such trusts were unenforceable at law. The legislature intends that such trusts be recognized as valid, and that such trusts be enforceable in accordance with their terms.

[ 2001 c 327 s 1.]